Massachusetts, session 194th, H5625.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 5 in section 1 of chapter 294 of the acts of 1961, as amended by 
section 1 of chapter 306 of the acts of 1973, is hereby further amended by striking out the second 
paragraph and inserting in place thereof the following paragraph:- 
The board of directors shall meet at least quarterly. A majority of the directors shall 
constitute a quorum.  
SECTION 2. Section 6 in said section 1 of said chapter 294, as most recently amended by 
section 2 of chapter 323 of the acts of 2020, is hereby further amended by striking out the first 3 
paragraphs and inserting in place thereof the following 4 paragraphs:-  
Whenever it shall appear to the commissioner that it is inadvisable or inexpedient for any 
member to continue to transact the business for which it was organized without receiving 
financial or other assistance, the commissioner may, in the commissioner’s discretion, so notify 
the directors of the corporation, and thereupon the directors of the corporation make take any 

of 7 
action in their opinion that they deem necessary to reduce the risk or avert a threatened loss to 
the corporation. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the corporation may merge or 
consolidate such member or may facilitate the sale of assets of such member to and the 
assumption of its liabilities by 1 or more members.  
The directors of the corporation may with the approval of the commissioner and in order 
to effect the purposes of this act, and without limiting the aforesaid powers of the corporation, 
provide any 1 or more of the following forms of financial assistance to a member in need of 
same: (a) purchase from such member the whole or any part of, or any equitable or any other 
interest in, its assets at the book value thereof, or at some other value mutually agreed upon by 
the directors of the member credit union and the directors of the corporation, notwithstanding 
that either of such values may exceed the market value of the assets so purchased, and upon such 
terms and conditions as the directors of the corporation with the approval of the commissioner, 
may determine; (b) make loans to such member, and upon such terms and conditions, as the 
directors of the corporation, with the approval of the commissioner, may determine; (c) pay to 
such member in accordance with an agreement entered into between such member and the 
corporation, with the approval of the commissioner, an amount not in excess of the difference 
between the book value of certain or all its assets and the fair value thereof as determined by said 
agreement, in consideration for which such member shall agree to write down such assets to such 
fair value and to pay over to the corporation so much of any net proceeds realized from the sale 
or other disposition of each and all such assets as is in excess of such fair value, such payment to 
be made in such amounts, at such times and upon such terms and conditions as the directors of 
the corporation, with the approval of the commissioner, may determine; provided, that any 
amount paid by the corporation hereunder to such member and the agreement of such member to 

of 7 
repay the excess, as hereinbefore provided, shall constitute liabilities of such member only to the 
extent of any such excess from time to time actually realized; (d) deposit a sum of money into 
the loan reserve, investment reserve, undivided earnings or any other surplus accounts of such 
member in accordance with an agreement entered into between such member and the 
corporation, with the approval of the commissioner, such member being hereby authorized and 
empowered, notwithstanding any other provision of law, to repay such amount to the corporation 
at such time or times and in such manner as such agreement may prescribe; and provided further, 
that any such payment made by the corporation to such member, and any agreement of such 
member to repay the same shall constitute liabilities of such member only to the extent provided 
by said agreement. The member, by vote of at least 2/3 of its directors, may take any and all 
action necessary or advisable to enable it to carry out any or all provisions of this section.  
In addition to or apart from the financial assistance authorized under the preceding 
paragraph, the corporation, by vote of at least 2/3 of its directors and in order to effect the 
purposes of this act may, by agreement with a member and with the approval of the 
commissioner, grant financial assistance to such member by any or all of the methods prescribed 
in the preceding paragraph and subject to the terms, conditions and benefits contained in clauses 
(a) to (d), inclusive, of the preceding paragraph, for any of the purposes stated in this section or 
for the purpose of providing reserve funds for the protection of depositors of such credit unions.  
In addition to the financial assistance authorized under the preceding 3 paragraphs, the 
corporation, by vote of at least 2/3 of its directors and in order to effect the purposes of this act 
may also, by agreement with a member and with the approval of the commissioner, grant 
financial assistance to such member credit union by any or all of the following additional 

of 7 
methods for any of the purposes stated in this section or to provide reserve funds for the 
protection of depositors of such credit union: (a) make a deposit in such member credit union of 
such amount as the directors deem advisable which deposit shall not be subject to any limits 
imposed by chapter 171 of the General Laws or the by-laws of the credit union and which may or 
may not be a subordinated deposit and may or may not be in accordance with an agreement that 
dividends thereon will be at a lower rate than is paid to the members; (b) assume any liabilities of 
such member credit union; (c) make loans or contributions to or deposits in, or purchase any 
assets of, any financial institution that will acquire control of or merge or consolidate with such 
member credit union or will purchase the assets and assume the liabilities of such member credit 
union; (d) guarantee such member credit union, or any financial institution that will acquire 
control of or merge or consolidate with such member credit union or will purchase the assets and 
assume the liability of such member credit union, against loss by reason of such acquisition of 
control, merger or consolidation or purchase of assets and assumption of liabilities; or (e) take 
any other action that the directors in their opinion deem appropriate to carry out the purposes of 
this section.  
SECTION 3. Section 9 in said section 1 of said chapter 294, as most recently amended by 
section 6 of chapter 168 of the acts of 2004, is hereby further amended by striking out the first 
sentence and inserting in place thereof the following sentence:- 
The corporation may by a majority vote of the board of directors and with the approval of 
the commissioner borrow money from members and others and pledge its assets as security 
therefor. 

of 7 
SECTION 4. Said section 9 in said section 1 of said chapter 294, as so amended, is 
hereby further amended by adding the following paragraph:- 
The corporation shall be deemed to be an organization member, as defined in section 1 of 
chapter 171 of the General Laws, of its member credit unions. Any member credit union may 
lend money to the corporation as an organization member. 
SECTION 5. The first paragraph of section 16 in said section 1 of said chapter 294, as 
appearing in chapter 253 of the acts of 2014, is hereby amended by striking out clauses (iii) and 
(iv) and inserting in place thereof the following 3 clauses:- 
(iii) invest individually or with 1 or more credit unions or federal credit unions up to 5 
per cent of its assets in 1 or more credit union service organizations engaging in activities or 
providing services authorized by law; provided, however, that for purposes solely related to the 
investment of credit unions in credit union service organizations pursuant to this clause, the 
corporation shall be deemed a credit union; 
(iv) upon a 2/3 vote of its board of directors and having established that such activity will 
not adversely affect its safety and soundness and having adequate policies and procedures to 
ensure such investments governing the performance of the corporation and its employees, to 
minimize any credit, market, liquidity, operations, legal and reputation risks to the corporation, 
may apply to the commissioner to make investments under the prudent person authority, as 
follows: 
(1) in shares of stock registered on a national securities exchange as provided in the 
Securities Exchange Act of 1934, 15 U.S.C. 78a or for which quotations are available through 

of 7 
 100 the financial industry regulatory authority or any comparable service designated by the 
101 commissioner; 
102  (2) interest bearing obligations of any state, county, city, town or district or any 
103 subdivision or instrumentality thereof and of any authority established under the laws of the 
104 United States or any state, county, town or district, including obligations of any of the foregoing 
105 payable from specified revenues; 
106  (3) interest bearing obligations of any corporation organized under the laws of the United 
107 States or any state and of any association the business of which is conducted or transacted by 
108 trustees under a written instrument or declaration of trust having its principal place of business in 
109 the commonwealth;  
110  (4) preferred and common stock of any corporation described in subclause (3); and 
111  (v) upon a 2/3 vote of its board of directors and having established that such activity will 
112 not adversely affect its safety and soundness and having adequate policies and procedures to 
113 ensure such investments governing the performance of the corporation and its employees, to 
114 minimize any credit, market, liquidity, operations, legal and reputation risks to the corporation, 
115 the corporation may apply to the commissioner to make investments not specifically enumerated 
116 in section 12; provided, that: 
117  (1) the corporation may invest up to 15 per cent of its assets in these investments at the 
118 time of purchase with the investment in any 1 issuer not exceeding 5 per cent of the 
119 corporation’s total assets at the time of purchase; 

of 7 
 120  (2) the corporation may authorize investment advisers registered under the Investment 
121 Advisers Act of 1940, 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 to 64, inclusive, to acquire or dispose of these 
122 investments for the corporation;  
123  (3) any approval granted by the commissioner pursuant to this clause shall be subject to 
124 such conditions and limitations as the commissioner may impose;  
125  (4) the percentage of assets authorized pursuant to this clause shall be determined by the 
126 commissioner; and 
127  (5) the commissioner may increase, modify, curtail or rescind or otherwise limit the 
128 corporation’s authority to make investments pursuant to this clause.